Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4303
Confidential communications; disclosure; when.

(1) A victim, an advocate without the consent of the victim, a third party as described in subdivision (3) of section 29-4302 without the consent of the victim, or a minor or incapacitated victim without the consent of a custodial guardian or a guardian ad litem appointed upon application of either party, shall not be compelled to give testimony or to produce records concerning a confidential communication for any purpose in any criminal, civil, legislative, administrative, or other proceeding, except as follows:

(a) The party seeking disclosure of a confidential communication shall, in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding, file a motion that sets forth specifically the issues on which disclosure is sought and enumerates the reasons why the party is seeking disclosure and why disclosure is necessary, accompanied by an affidavit or affidavits containing specific information which establishes that the confidential communication constitutes relevant and material evidence in the case; and

(b) If the party seeking disclosure has complied with subdivision (a) of this subsection, the court or a hearing officer shall review the confidential communication in camera and out of the presence and hearing of all persons, except the victim, the advocate, and any other person the victim is willing to have present, to determine whether a failure to disclose the confidential communication would violate the constitutional rights of the party seeking disclosure.

(2) An advocate, a victim, or a third party as described in subdivision (3) of section 29-4302 cannot be compelled to provide testimony in any criminal, civil, legislative, administrative, or other proceeding that would identify the name, address, location, or telephone number of a safe house, abuse shelter, or other facility that provided temporary emergency shelter to the victim of the offense that is the subject of the proceeding unless the facility is a party to the proceeding.

Laws 2004, LB 613, § 3.